test/src/morphology/adj-lla_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Adjectives that belong to LEXICON ÁLLA, ÆLLA and SJONÁLLA. All the adjectives are loan words that have been adapted to lulesami. 

Tests:

  Adjective - antisosiálla: #  ÁLLA
    antisosiálla+A+Attr: sádnes
    antisosiálla+A+Sg+Nom: sádnes
    antisosiálla+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sáddnáp
    antisosiálla+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sáddnámus

  Adjective - aspektuálla: # ÁLLA
    aspektuálla+A+Attr: tjoaskes 
    aspektuálla+A+Sg+Nom: tjoaskes 
    aspektuálla+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjoasskásabbo
    aspektuálla+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjoasskásamos

  Adjective - eksperimentælla: # 
    eksperimentællas+A+Attr: vijdes 
    eksperimentællas+A+Sg+Nom: vijdes
    eksperimentællas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vijddásabbo
    eksperimentællas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vijddásamos


  Adjective - kontroversiælla: #  
    kontroversiælla+A+Attr: vájves
    kontroversiælla+A+Sg+Nom: vájves
    kontroversiælla+A+Sg+Gen: vájvvása
    kontroversiælla+A+Sg+Acc: vájvvásav
    kontroversiælla+A+Sg+Ill: vájvvásij
    kontroversiælla+A+Sg+Ine: vájvvásin
    kontroversiælla+A+Sg+Ela: vájvvásis
    kontroversiælla+A+Sg+Com: vájvvásijn
    kontroversiælla+A+Pl+Nom: vájvvása
    kontroversiælla+A+Pl+Gen: vájvvásij
    kontroversiælla+A+Pl+Acc: vájvvásijt
    kontroversiælla+A+Pl+Ill: vájvvásijda
    kontroversiælla+A+Pl+Ine: vájvvásijn
    kontroversiælla+A+Pl+Ela: vájvvásijs
    kontroversiælla+A+Pl+Com: vájvvásij
    kontroversiælla+A+Ess: vájvvásin
    kontroversiælla+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vájvvásabbo
    kontroversiælla+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vájvvásamos

  Adjective - paralælla: # 
    paralælla+A+Attr: []
    paralælla+A+Sg+Nom: []
    paralælla+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    paralælla+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Adjective - internasjonálla #
    internasjonálla+A+Attr: []
    internasjonálla+A+Sg+Nom: []
    internasjonálla+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    internasjonálla+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - åvtådimensjonálla: #  SJONÁLLA
    åvtådimensjonálla+A+Attr: dibma
    åvtådimensjonálla+A+Sg+Nom: dimes
    åvtådimensjonálla+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: dibmasabbo
    åvtådimensjonálla+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dibmasamos
